Tennessee statutes. Title 20 Civil Procedure
Part 1

Venue of Actions

20-4-101. Transitory actions.

In all civil actions of a transitory nature, unless venue is otherwise expressly provided for, the action may be brought in the county where the cause of action arose or in the county where the individual defendant resides.

If, however, the plaintiff and defendant both reside in the same county in this state, then the action shall be brought either in the county where the cause of action arose or in the county of their residence.

Where the action is brought either in the county where the cause of action arose or in the county where the defendant resides, process may be sent to another county as in local action, and it shall not be necessary nor required that the defendant be in the county of action either when the action is commenced or during the time between the commencement of the action and service of process.

Code 1858, §§ 2808, 2809 (deriv. Acts 1809 (Sept.), ch. 126, § 3); Shan., §§ 4513, 4514; Code 1932, §§ 8640, 8641; Acts 1967, ch. 55, § 1; 1971, ch. 51, § 1; 1972, ch. 446, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-401; Acts 2011, ch. 510, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 510, § 1 provided that the act shall be known and cited as the “Tennessee Civil Justice Act of 2011.”

Acts 2011, ch. 510, § 24 provided that the act, which amended subsection (a), shall apply to all liability actions for injuries, deaths and losses covered by the act which accrue on or after October 1, 2011.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment substituted “individual defendant resides” for “defendant resides or is found” at the end of (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2011, ch. 510, § 24. October 1, 2011.

Cross-References. Divorce action, §36-4-105.

Venue of chancery courts, §16-11-114.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 121.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 1-8-4.1, 1-8-2, 1-8-12.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Actions, § 5; 3 Tenn. Juris., Attorney and Client, § 12; 4 Tenn. Juris., Automobiles, § 36; 7 Tenn. Juris., Corporations, § 118; 11 Tenn. Juris., Equity, § 47; 24 Tenn. Juris., Venue, §§ 3, 4; 26 Tenn. Juris., Workers' Compensation, § 47.

Law Reviews.

Abolishing Local Action Rules: A First Step toward Modernizing Jurisdiction and Venue in Tennessee, 34 U. Mem. L. Rev. 251 (2004).

Jurisdiction, Venue and “Localized Actions” in Tennessee (June F. Entman), 39 No. 4 Tenn. B.J. 33 (2003).

Tennessee Workers' Compensation — Where Is the Proper Venue? (D. Andrew Byrne, Ted C. Raynor), 20 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 189 (1990).

Comparative Legislation. Venue:

Ala. Code §6-3-1 et seq.

Ark. Code §16-60-101 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. §9-10-30 et seq.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 452.400 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. §11-11-1 et seq.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 508.010 et seq.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 1-76 et seq.

Va. Code § 8.01-257 et seq.

Cited: Flowers v. Aetna Casualty & Surety Co., 186 Tenn. 603, 212 S.W.2d 595, 1948 Tenn. LEXIS 587 (1948); Williams v. Williams, 193 Tenn. 133, 244 S.W.2d 995, 1951 Tenn. LEXIS 336 (1951); White v. Garner, 192 Tenn. 429, 241 S.W.2d 518, 1951 Tenn. LEXIS 425 (1951); Parker v. Reddick, 196 Tenn. 472, 268 S.W.2d 357, 1954 Tenn. LEXIS 408, 45 A.L.R.2d 1096 (1954); Beckham v. Johnson, 220 Tenn. 572, 421 S.W.2d 94, 1967 Tenn. LEXIS 439 (1967); Romines v. K & S Engineering & Contracting Co., 556 S.W.2d 85, 1977 Tenn. LEXIS 610 (Tenn. 1977); Turpin v. Conner Bros. Excavating Co., 761 S.W.2d 296, 1988 Tenn. LEXIS 242 (Tenn. 1988); Woods v. Fields, 798 S.W.2d 239, 1990 Tenn. App. LEXIS 216 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1990); Valley Fidelity Bank & Trust Co. v. Ayers, 861 S.W.2d 366, 1993 Tenn. App. LEXIS 361 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1993); Davis v. Holland, 31 S.W.3d 574, 2000 Tenn. App. LEXIS 184 (Tenn. Ct. App. 2000); Hawkins v. Tenn. Dep't of Corr., 127 S.W.3d 749, 2002 Tenn. App. LEXIS 536 (Tenn. Ct. App. 2002); Netherland v. Hunter, 133 S.W.3d 614, 2003 Tenn. App. LEXIS 730 (Tenn. Ct. App. 2003); Zakour v. Ut Med. Group, Inc., — S.W.3d —, 2011 Tenn. App. LEXIS 261 (Tenn. Ct. App. May 19, 2011).

20-4-102. District in which tort arose.

When the plaintiff and defendant are both residents of the same county but reside in different districts within the venue of separate courts, a tort action may be brought in the court within the venue of the district where the cause of action arose, and the process may be served in other districts in the county not within the venue of the court.

[Deleted by 2011 amendment.]

Acts 1953, ch. 34, §§ 3, 4 (Williams, §§ 8641.3, 8641.4); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-403; Acts 2011, ch. 510, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 510, § 1 provided that the act shall be known and cited as the “Tennessee Civil Justice Act of 2011.”

Acts 2011, ch. 510, § 24 provided that the act, which deleted former subsection (b), shall apply to all liability actions for injuries, deaths and losses covered by the act which accrue on or after October 1, 2011.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment deleted (b) which read: “This section shall also apply to corporations, either domestic or foreign, that maintain an office or agency, or are otherwise amenable to service of process, in a district in the county where the cause of action arose, but outside of the district within the venue of the court where the cause of action arose and where the action is pending.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2011, ch. 510, § 24. October 1, 2011.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 4 Tenn. Juris., Automobiles, § 36; 24 Tenn. Juris., Venue, § 4.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

Cited: Hawkins v. Tenn. Dep't of Corr., 127 S.W.3d 749, 2002 Tenn. App. LEXIS 536 (Tenn. Ct. App. 2002).

20-4-103. Actions in rem.

In actions commenced by the attachment of property without personal service of process, and in cases where the suit is brought to obtain possession of personal property, or to enforce a lien or trust deed or mortgage, or where it relates to real property, the attachment may be sued out or suit brought in any county where the real property, or any portion of it, lies, or where any part of the personal property may be found.

Code 1858, § 2810 (deriv. Acts 1847-1848, ch. 173); Shan., § 4515; mod. Code 1932, § 8642; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-404.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 121.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 3 Tenn. Juris., Attachment and Garnishment, §§ 3, 34, 101; 10 Tenn. Juris., Ejectment, § 13; 24 Tenn. Juris., Venue, § 4.

Law Reviews.

Venue — Localizing Transitory Actions in Tennessee Civil Proceedings, 35 Tenn. L. Rev. 520.

20-4-104. Business office of party.

For all civil actions, if the defendant is not a natural person, the action shall be brought in:

The county where all or a substantial part of the events or omissions giving rise to the cause of action accrued;

The county where any defendant organized under the laws of this state maintains its principal office; or

If the defendant is not organized under the laws of this state, the county where the defendant's registered agent for service of process is located; or

If the defendant does not maintain a registered agent within this state, the county where the person designated by statute as the defendant's agent for service of process is located.

Code 1858, § 2811 (deriv. Acts 1845-1846, ch. 55, § 2; 1849-1850, ch. 136; 1851-1852, ch. 136); Shan., § 4516; Code 1932, § 8643; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-40; Acts 2011, ch. 510, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 510, § 1 provided that the act shall be known and cited as the “Tennessee Civil Justice Act of 2011.”

Acts 2011, ch. 510, § 24 provided that the act, which rewrote this section, shall apply to all liability actions for injuries, deaths and losses covered by the act which accrue on or after October 1, 2011.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment rewrote this section which read: “When a corporation, partnership or individual has an office or agency in any county for the transaction of business, actions growing out of, or connected with, the business of that office or agency, may be brought in the county in which the office or agency is located.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2011, ch. 510, § 24. October 1, 2011.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Agency, § 57; 7 Tenn. Juris., Corporations, §§ 91, 118, 121; 24 Tenn. Juris., Venue, §§ 2, 4.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

Cited: Cartmell v. Mechanics' Ins. Co., 167 Tenn. 498, 71 S.W.2d 688, 1934 Tenn. LEXIS 7 (1934); Flowers v. Aetna Casualty & Surety Co., 186 Tenn. 603, 212 S.W.2d 595, 1948 Tenn. LEXIS 587 (1948); Commercial Truck & Trailer Sales, Inc. v. McCampbell, 580 S.W.2d 765, 1979 Tenn. LEXIS 427 (Tenn. 1979); Nelson v. Ford Motor Credit Co., 590 S.W.2d 457, 1979 Tenn. App. LEXIS 343 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1979); Five Star Express v. Davis, 866 S.W.2d 944, 1993 Tenn. LEXIS 413 (Tenn. 1993).

20-4-105. Objection to venue.

If action is brought in the wrong county, it may be prosecuted to a termination, unless abated by plea of the defendant.

Code 1858, § 2812; Shan., § 4517; Code 1932, § 8644; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-406.

Cross-References. Pleading, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 7-12.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Minors, § 28; 24 Tenn. Juris., Venue, §§ 2, 3.

Law Reviews.

Jurisdiction, Venue and “Localized Actions” in Tennessee (June F. Entman), 39 No. 4 Tenn. B.J. 33 (2003).

Venue — Localizing Transitory Actions in Tennessee Civil Proceedings, 35 Tenn. L. Rev. 520.

Cited: Hall v. Southhall Bros. & Carl, 146 Tenn. 129, 240 S.W. 298, 1921 Tenn. LEXIS 9 (1921); Metropolitan Dev. & Housing Agency v. Brown Stove Works, Inc., 637 S.W.2d 876, 1982 Tenn. App. LEXIS 390 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1982).

20-4-106. [Repealed.]

Acts 1968, ch. 523, § 1 (17.05); T.C.A., § 20-407, repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 510, § 5, effective October 1, 2011.

Compiler's Notes. Former §20-4-106 concerned venue of actions against foreign corporations.

20-4-107. Real property — State or agency a party.

Notwithstanding any other law or rule of procedure to the contrary, any action the subject matter of which involves real property in which this state, or any agency of this state, is a party, may be properly instituted in any county in which the property is located.

Acts 1981, ch. 493, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Judicial Review under the Tennessee Uniform Administrative Procedures Act — An Update (Ben H. Cantrell), 13 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 589 (1984).

Cited: Bowden Bldg. Corp. v. Tennessee Real Estate Comm'n, 15 S.W.3d 434, 1999 Tenn. App. LEXIS 487 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1999); Lanius v. Nashville Elec. Serv., 181 S.W.3d 661, 2005 Tenn. LEXIS 1047 (Tenn. 2005); Williams v. Nicely, 230 S.W.3d 385, 2007 Tenn. App. LEXIS 111 (Tenn. Ct. App. Feb. 28, 2007).

20-4-108. Construction.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to repeal or modify any other specific or special venue provision of state law.

Acts 2011, ch. 510, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 510, § 1 provided that the act shall be known and cited as the “Tennessee Civil Justice Act of 2011.”

Acts 2011, ch. 510, § 24 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall apply to all liability actions for injuries, deaths and losses covered by the act which accrue on or after October 1, 2011.

Effective Dates. Acts 2011, ch. 510, § 24. October 1, 2011.